Louisiana, session 2026, HB359.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:410.8(C) and 410.9(C) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§410.8. Candidates not affiliated with a major political party; qualifying for the
general election; death of a candidate
* * *
C. If a person who qualified as a candidate pursuant to this Section dies after
the close of the qualifying period and before the time for closing the polls on the day
of the general election, the name of the deceased candidate shall not be printed on
the general election ballot. If the general election ballot was printed with the
deceased candidate's name on it, any votes received by the deceased candidate shall
be void and shall not be counted for any purpose whatsoever.
§410.9. Nomination of candidates in a party primary election; general election;
unopposed candidate
* * *
C. If a major party candidate qualifies for the general election pursuant to this
Section or R.S. 18:410.7 in a special election held to fill an unexpired term and there
are no other remaining candidates for the general election then the qualified
candidate is declared elected by the people and shall be certified pursuant to R.S.
18:513.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 359 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.